Hawaii statutes.
§802-7 Litigation expenses. The court
may, upon a satisfactory showing that a criminal defendant is unable to pay for
transcripts or witness fees and transportation, or for investigatory, expert or
other services, and upon a finding that the same are necessary for an adequate
defense, direct that such expenses be paid from available court funds or
waived, as the case may be; provided that where the defendant is represented by
the state public defender or by other counsel appointed by the court except for
such other counsel appointed by the court for reasons of conflict of interest
on the part of the public defender, the public defender shall pay for or
authorize payment for the same, if the public defender determines that the
defendant is unable to pay for the same and that the same are necessary for an
adequate defense, and if there is a dispute as to the financial ability of the
defendant such dispute shall be resolved by the court. In cases where other
counsel have been appointed by the court for reasons of conflict of interest,
the court may, upon the requisite showing of inability to pay and a finding
that such expenses are necessary for an adequate defense as set forth above,
direct that such expenses be paid from available court funds or waived, as the
case may be. [L 1971, c 185, pt of §1; HRS §705C-7; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1
and am L 1972, c 44, §1(d); am L 1976, c 131, §3; am L 1979, c 174, §1]

Case Notes

Defendant requesting services on basis of indigency is
entitled to hearing. 61 H. 203, 600 P.2d 1383 (1979).

Where defendant is unable to pay for necessary defense
services, defendant may be eligible for court payment even though represented
by private counsel. 61 H. 203, 600 P.2d 1383 (1979).

Although the language of this section suggests that the court
has discretion to direct that transcript expenses are paid, the balance of the
pertinent statutory language indicates that once a satisfactory showing of need
for the transcripts and inability to pay has been made, the court should direct
that such expenses be paid, unless alternative means for timely obtaining the
transcripts are available. This is evident as this section mandates that the
public defender's office is required to furnish the relevant transcripts upon
making the same findings as the court. 131 H. 333, 319 P.3d 252 (2013).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next